Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Erection of Lines; Rights-of-Way; Eminent Domain, etc.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 17.

§ 56-458.
Right to erect lines parallel to railroads; occupation of roads, streets, etc.; location of same.

Every telegraph company and every telephone company incorporated by this or any other state, or by the United States, may construct, maintain and operate its line along and parallel to any of the railroads of the Commonwealth, and shall have authority
to occupy and use the public parks, roads, works, turnpikes, streets, avenues and alleys in any of the counties, with the consent of the board of supervisors or other governing authority thereof, or in any incorporated city or
town, with the consent of the council thereof, and the waterways within this Commonwealth, for the erection of poles and wires, or cables, or the laying of underground conduits, portions of which they may lease, rent, or hire to
other like companies; provided, however, that if the road or street be in the State Highway System or the secondary system of state highways, the consent of the board of supervisors or other governing authority of any county shall
not be necessary, but a permit for such occupation and use shall first be obtained from the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

No locality or the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall impose any fees on a certificated provider of telecommunications service for the use of public rights-of-way except in the manner prescribed in § 56-468.1; provided, however, the provisions of
§ 56-468.1 shall not apply to providers of commercial mobile radio services.

No locality or the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall impose on certificated providers of telecommunications service, whether by franchise, ordinance or other means, any restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way
(including but not limited to the permitting process; notice, time and location of excavations and repair work; enforcement of the statewide building code; and inspections), which are (i) unfair or unreasonable or (ii) any greater
than those imposed on the following users of the public rights-of-way: all providers of telecommunications services and nonpublic providers of cable television, electric, natural gas, water and sanitary sewer services. For purposes
of this subsection, “restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way” shall not include any existing franchise fee or the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any permit or other permission required by a locality pursuant to a franchise, ordinance, or other permission to use the public rights-of-way or by the Commonwealth Transportation Board of a certificated provider
of telecommunications services to use the public rights-of-way shall be granted or denied within forty-five days from submission and, if denied, accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons the permit was denied and the
actions required to cure the denial.

No locality receiving directly or indirectly a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee or the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall require a certificated provider of telecommunications services to provide in-kind services or physical assets as a condition of
consent to use public rights-of-way or easements, or in lieu of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee. This shall not limit the ability of localities, their authorities or commissions which provide utility services, or the Commonwealth
Transportation Board to enter into voluntary pole attachment, conduit occupancy or conduit construction agreements with certificated providers of telecommunications service. Any locality, other than a city or town electing to continue
to enforce an existing franchise, ordinance or other form of consent under subsection J of § 56-468.1, or the Commonwealth Transportation Board may continue to use pole attachments and conduits utilized as of December 31, 1997.
Any pole attachment or conduit occupancy fees charged by certificated providers of telecommunications services for this use shall be waived for facilities in place as of December 31, 1997, and shall be waived for future extensions
in cities with populations between 60,000 and 70,000, so long as the locality or the Commonwealth Transportation Board continues to use these facilities on such poles or in such conduits solely for their internal communications
needs. The fee waiver is for the occupancy fees only, does not cover any relocation, rearrangement or other make-ready costs, and does not apply to any county, city or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4.

History.
Code 1919, § 4035; 1926, p. 907; 1997, cc. 474, 515; 1998, cc. 742, 758; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2006, c. 780.

Cross references.

For definitions, see § 56-1.

As to telephone and telegraph companies as public utilities, see § 56-232.

As to applicability of this section to other corporations, see § 56-256.

As to right of railroad to maintain telephone or telegraph line, see § 56-383.

For constitutional provision as to powers of State Corporation Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

As to regulation of fees, rates and services of cable television systems, see §

15.2-2108.22

et seq.

As to regulation of use of public rights-of-way by franchised cable operators, see §

15.2-2108.23

.

As to unlawful use of, or injury to, telephone and telegraph lines, see §

18.2-164

.

Editor’s note.

The 1997 amendments by Acts 1997, cc. 474 and 515, expired July 1, 1998, pursuant to Acts 1997, cc. 474 and 515, cl. 2.

Acts 1998, cc. 742 and 758, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any county having the county manager form of government.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4 provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8 provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9 provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 474 and 515, effective March 18, 1997, were identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B. For expiration date, see Editor’s note above.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 742 and 758 are identical, and added the subsection A designation; and added subsections B through E. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and in subsection E, deleted “and” following “only” in the final sentence, and inserted “and does not apply to any county, city or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4” at
the end of that sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 780, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “subsection I” for “subsection J” in the third sentence of subsection E. See Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9.

Law Review.

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commission, § 17; 18 M.J. Telegraph and Telephone Companies, § 2.

§ 56-458.1.
Relocation of lines or works of certain public utilities acquired by Commonwealth Transportation Board.

Whenever a telegraph or telephone company, or any company mentioned in Chapter 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.) of this title, shall be required by the Commonwealth Transportation Board, or the Commissioner of Highways, to remove any part of its lines or works off
of the right-of-way of a road now or hereafter included in either state highway system, or if any right-of-way, property or interest therein used and occupied by such company with its lines or works, or part thereof, is acquired by
the Commonwealth Transportation Board, or the Commissioner of Highways, for the uses of either such highway system, or if such company is notified by such Board or Commissioner of the desire of such Board or Commissioner to acquire
such right-of-way, property, or interest therein, used and occupied by such company with its lines or works, or part thereof, for the uses of either such highway system, such company may relocate its lines or works, or the part or
parts thereof affected. If unable to agree with the owner or owners for the right-of-way, or property, or interest therein for such relocation, such company, in addition to its other powers, shall have the right to acquire such rights-of-way,
or property, or interest therein for the purpose of such relocation of its lines or works, or part or parts thereof in the manner provided by the laws of this Commonwealth for the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

History.
1926, p. 507; Michie Code 1942, § 4384a.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’
to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 28.

§ 56-459.
Removal of old line not required by this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the Commonwealth Transportation Board to require the removal of the lines and works of any telegraph or telephone company from any street or road in either state highway system which such company
is occupying by consent of the appropriate board of supervisors or other governing authority obtained under Chapter 159 of the Code of 1919 prior to June 22, 1926, without permitting such company to occupy some other part of the right-of-way
existing or acquired for such street or road.

History.
1926, p. 909; Michie Code 1942, § 4038.

Cross references.

As to applicability of this section to other corporations, see § 56-256.

§ 56-460.
How consent of appropriate authorities obtained; terms of use.

The consent required under § 56-458, when given, shall be by ordinance regularly adopted by the council or other governing body of the city or town, or by resolution regularly adopted and spread upon the minutes by the board of supervisors or other governing
authority of the county, in which such line is to be located, or, if such consent is to be given by the Commonwealth Transportation Board, by an order spread upon the minutes of the Board. Such use of the public parks, roads, turnpikes,
streets, avenues, and alleys in any of the cities or towns or counties of this Commonwealth shall be subject to such terms, regulations and restrictions as may be imposed by the corporate authorities of any such city or town, or the
board of supervisors or other governing authority of any such county, except that if the road or street be in either state highway system, as now or hereafter established, any occupation and use thereof under the provisions of this
chapter, whether by consent heretofore or hereafter obtained, shall be subject to such terms, regulations and restrictions as may be imposed by the Commonwealth Transportation Board not in conflict in incorporated cities and towns
with any vested contractual rights of such company with such city or town.

History.
Code 1919, § 4037; 1926, p. 908.

Cross references.

As to applicability of this section to other corporations, see § 56-256.

§ 56-461.
Cost to Commonwealth in connection with construction of line to be paid by company.

The actual costs and expenses of the Commonwealth in the investigation by the Commonwealth Transportation Board of the application of any company for a permit, and in the supervision of the construction or installation of any of the works of the company,
under the provisions of this chapter, shall be borne by such company, and paid before commencing the use of any road or street in either state highway system, under any permit of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, under the provisions
of this chapter, which sum shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the state highway fund.

History.
Code 1919, § 4037; 1926, p. 909.

§ 56-462.
Franchise to occupy parks, streets, etc.; imposition of terms, conditions, etc., as to use of streets, etc., and construction thereon.

No incorporated city or town shall grant to any such telegraph or telephone corporation the right to erect its poles, wires, or cables, or to lay its conduits upon or beneath its parks, streets, avenues, or alleys until such company shall have first obtained,
in the manner prescribed by the laws of this Commonwealth, the franchise to occupy the same. Any city or town may impose upon any such corporation any terms and conditions consistent herewith and supplemental hereto, as to the
occupation and use of its parks, streets, avenues, and alleys, and as to the construction and maintenance of the facilities of such company along, over, or under the same, that the city or town may deem expedient and proper. The
Department of Transportation may also impose upon any such company any terms, rules, regulations, requirements, restrictions and conditions consistent herewith and supplemental hereto, as to the occupation and use of roads and
streets in either state highway system, and as to the construction, operation or maintenance of the works along, over, or under the same, which the Department may deem expedient and proper, but not in conflict, in incorporated
cities and towns, with any vested contractual rights of any such company with such city or town.

No locality or the Department of Transportation shall impose any fees on a certificated provider of telecommunications service for the use of public rights-of-way except in the manner prescribed in § 56-468.1; however, the provisions of § 56-468.1 shall
not apply to providers of commercial mobile radio services.

No locality or the Department of Transportation shall impose on certificated providers of telecommunications service, whether by franchise, ordinance or other means, any restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way (including
but not limited to the permitting process; notice, time and location of excavations and repair work; enforcement of the statewide building code; and inspections), which are (i) unfair or unreasonable or (ii) any greater than those
imposed on the following users of the public rights-of-way: all providers of telecommunications services and nonpublic providers of cable television, electric, natural gas, water and sanitary sewer services. For purposes of this
subsection, “restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way” shall not include any existing franchise fee or the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any permit or other permission required by a locality pursuant to a franchise, ordinance, or other permission to use the public rights-of-way or by the Department of Transportation of a certificated provider
of telecommunications services to use the public rights-of-way shall be granted or denied within 45 days from submission and, if denied, accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons the permit was denied and the actions
required to cure the denial.

No locality receiving directly or indirectly a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee or the Department of Transportation shall require a certificated provider of telecommunications services to provide in-kind services or physical assets as a condition of consent
to use public rights-of-way or easements, or in lieu of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee. This shall not limit the ability of localities, their authorities or commissions which provide utility services, or the Department of Transportation
to enter into voluntary pole attachment, conduit occupancy or conduit construction agreements with certificated providers of telecommunications service. Any locality, other than a city or town electing to continue to enforce an
existing franchise, ordinance or other form of consent under subsection J of § 56-468.1, or the Department of Transportation may continue to use pole attachments and conduits utilized as of December 31, 1997. Any pole attachment
or conduit occupancy fees for this use shall be waived for facilities in place as of December 31, 1997, and shall be waived for future extensions in cities with populations between 60,000 and 70,000, so long as the locality or
the Department of Transportation continues to use these facilities on such poles or in such conduits solely for their internal communications needs. The fee waiver is for the occupancy fees only, does not cover any relocation,
rearrangement or other make-ready costs, and does not apply to any county, city or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4.

History.
Code 1919, § 4038; 1926, p. 909; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 40; 1997, cc. 474, 515; 1998, cc. 742, 758; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2006, c. 780; 2013, cc. 585, 646.

Cross references.

As to regulation of fees, rates and services of cable television systems, see §

15.2-2108.22

et seq.

As to adoption of requirements and procedures for the management of public rights-of-way relating to cable television systems, see §

15.2-2108.23

.

Editor’s note.

The 1997 amendments by Acts 1997, cc. 474 and 515, expired July 1, 1998, pursuant to Acts 1997, cc. 474 and 515, cl. 2.

Acts 1998, cc. 742 and 758, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any county having the county manager form of government.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4 provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8 provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9 provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

Acts 2013, cc. 585 and 646, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to invalidate any action taken or approval rendered by the Commonwealth Transportation Board prior to July 1, 2013, and that any and all actions taken
and all approvals rendered by the Board prior to July 1, 2013, shall remain valid and in effect unless modified, superseded, or repealed by subsequent action of the Board.”

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 474 and 515, effective March 18, 1997, were identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B. For expiration date, see Editor’s note above.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 742 and 758 are identical, and added the subsection A designation, in subsection A, rewrote the second sentence, and in the last sentence, deleted “and” preceding “The Commonwealth,” inserted “also,” substituted “consistent”
for “inconsistent,” and substituted “and” for “or” following “herewith”; and added subsections B through E. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and in subsection E, deleted “and” following “only” in the final sentence, and added “and does not apply to any county, city or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4” at the
end of that sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 780 substituted “subsection J” for “subsection I” in the third sentence of subsection E. See Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 585 and 646 are identical, and substituted “Department of Transportation” for “Commonwealth Transportation Board” throughout the section; substituted “Department” for “Board” in the last sentence in subsection A and made minor
stylistic changes.

§ 56-463.
Company may contract for right-of-way, etc.

Every telegraph or telephone company and every cable operator that has a franchise to use the public rights-of-way in a locality may contract with any person, the owner of lands, or of any interest, franchise, privilege, or easement therein or in respect
thereto, over which such line is proposed to be constructed, for the right-of-way for erecting, repairing, and preserving its poles and other structures necessary for operating its line, and in the case of telegraph or telephone companies,
for sufficient land for the erection and occupation of offices at suitable distances along its line for the public accommodation. No such company or operator may be required by the Commission or other governmental regulatory entity
to accept any such interest, franchise, privilege, or easement that restricts the services that may legally be offered by the company or operator.

History.
Code 1919, § 4039; 2009, c. 331.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 331, in the first sentence, substituted “telegraph or telephone company and every cable operator that has a franchise to use the public rights-of-way in a locality may contract with any person” for “such company may contract with
any person or corporation” and inserted “in the case of telegraph or telephone companies” and added the last sentence.

§ 56-464.
Right of eminent domain.

If the company and such owner cannot agree on the terms of such contract, the company may acquire such right-of-way in the manner provided by the laws of this Commonwealth for the exercise of the right of eminent domain. The title which may be acquired
by a telegraph or telephone company under this section shall be only to a right-of-way for the purpose stated in § 56-463; and no right-of-way acquired by any such company under this or the preceding sections of this chapter shall
be to the exclusion of other like companies from having or acquiring a like right-of-way over the same lands.

History.
Code 1919, § 4040.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 2, 11, 28; 18 M.J. Telegraph and Telephone Companies, § 2.

§ 56-465.
Preceding sections subject to repeal or change at pleasure.

The preceding sections of this chapter and also §§ 56-466, 56-467 and 56-484 shall be subject to repeal, alteration, or modification, and the rights and privileges acquired thereunder shall be subject to revocation or modification by the General Assembly
at its pleasure.

History.
Code 1919, § 4041.

§ 56-466.
Location of posts, poles, cables and conduits; height of wires, etc.

All posts, poles, wires, cables and conduits which shall be erected by any authority in the preceding sections of this chapter conferred shall be so located as in no way to obstruct or interfere with public travel or the ordinary use of, or the safety
and convenience of persons traveling through, on, or over, the public parks, roads, turnpikes, streets, avenues, alleys, railroads, or waters in or upon which the same may be erected, and all wires fastened upon posts or poles erected
as aforesaid shall be placed at a height of not less than eighteen feet above all road crossings, and twenty-three feet above railroad crossings, and no conduits shall be laid nor posts or poles erected upon the soil or property of
any person without first obtaining the consent of the owner thereof, nor shall any such wires or cables be strung across the soil, property, or premises of any person, or attached to or connected with any shade or ornamental tree,
or any private building, without the consent of the owner thereof.

Such poles, wires, cables and conduits shall not in anywise damage private property without compensation therefor, nor in any way obstruct the navigation of any stream, or impair or endanger the use thereof by the public, or by any person or corporation
entitled to the use of the same. Such conduits shall be laid at such distance below the surface of any public park, road, turnpike, street, avenue, or alley, and at such distance from the outside of any gas or water main or other conduit
already laid under such public park, road, turnpike, street, avenue, or alley, as may be prescribed by the proper municipal, county, or state authorities.

History.
Code 1919, §§ 4035, 4038; 1926, pp. 908, 909; 1976, c. 268.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
17 M.J. Streets and Highways, § 113.

§ 56-466.1.
Pole attachments; cable television systems and telecommunications service providers.

As used in this section:“Cable television system” means any system licensed, franchised or certificated pursuant to Article 1.2 (§

15.2-2108.19

et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 15.2 that transmits television signals, for distribution to subscribers of its services for a fee, by means of wires or cables connecting its distribution facilities with its subscriber’s
television receiver or other equipment connecting to the subscriber’s television receiver, and not by transmission of television signals through the air.“Electric cooperative” means a utility services cooperative formed under or
subject to Article 1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1.“Pole attachment” means any attachment by a cable television system or provider of telecommunications service to a pole, duct, conduit, right-of-way or similar facility
owned or controlled by a public utility.“Public utility” has the same meaning ascribed thereto in § 56-232.“Rearrangement” means work performed at the request of a telecommunications service provider or cable television system
to, on or in an existing pole, duct, conduit, right-of-way or similar facility owned or controlled by a public utility that is necessary to make such pole, duct, conduit, right-of-way, or similar facility usable for a pole attachment.
“Rearrangement” shall include replacement, at the request of a telecommunications service provider or cable television system, of the existing pole, duct, conduit, right-of-way, or similar facility if the existing pole, duct, conduit,
right-of-way, or similar facility does not contain adequate surplus space or excess capacity and cannot be rearranged so as to create the adequate surplus space or excess capacity required for a pole attachment.“Telecommunications
service provider” means any public service corporation or public service company that holds a certificate of public convenience and necessity to furnish local exchange telephone service or interexchange telephone service.

Upon request by a telecommunications service provider or cable television system to a public utility, both the public utility and the telecommunications service provider or cable television system shall negotiate in good faith to arrive at a mutually
agreeable contract for attachments to the public utility’s poles by the telecommunications service provider or cable television system.

After entering into a contract for attachments to its poles by any telecommunications service provider or cable television system, a public utility shall permit, upon reasonable terms and conditions and the payment of reasonable annual charges and the
cost of any required rearrangement, the attachment of any wire, cable, facility or apparatus to its poles or pedestals, or the placement of any wire, cable, facility or apparatus in conduit or duct space owned or controlled by
it, by such telecommunications service provider or cable television system that is authorized by law, to construct and maintain the attachment, provided that the attachment does not interfere, obstruct or delay the service and
operation of the public utility or create a safety hazard.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, a public utility providing electric utility service may deny access by a telecommunications service provider or cable television system to any pole, duct, conduit, right-of-way, or similar facility owned
or controlled, in whole or in part, by such public utility, provided such denial is made on a nondiscriminatory basis on grounds of insufficient capacity or reasons of safety, reliability, or generally applicable engineering principles.

This section shall not apply to any pole attachments regulated pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 224.

The Commission is authorized to determine just and reasonable rates, and terms and conditions of service, excluding safety and debt collection, for attachments to electric cooperative poles by telecommunications service providers or cable television systems
if, following good faith negotiations to do so, the parties cannot reach agreement thereon; however, the Commission shall not determine rates or terms and conditions for any existing agreement until it expires or is terminated
pursuant to its own terms. The terms of an expired or terminated agreement shall continue to govern while good faith negotiations or Commission review pursuant to this section are pending. Such determinations shall be made in accordance
with the following:

Just and reasonable pole attachment rates and terms and conditions of service to be determined by the Commission shall include, without limitation, rearrangement and make-ready costs, pole replacement costs, and all other costs directly related to pole
attachments and maintenance, replacement, and inspection of poles or pole attachments, and right of way maintenance essential to pole attachments, provided however, that cost recovery for rearrangement, make-ready and pole
replacement shall be addressed in terms and conditions, and shall not be included in annual rental rates;

In determining pole attachment rates, the Commission shall consider (i) any effect of such rates on the deployment or utilization, or both, of broadband and other telecommunications services, (ii) the interests of electric cooperatives’ members, and (iii)
the overall public interest;

The Commission may develop and utilize alternative forms of dispute resolution for purposes of addressing disputes (i) arising under this subsection and (ii) falling within the scope of the Commission’s authority established hereunder;

The Commission is authorized to assess reasonable application fees to recover appropriate Commission costs of proceedings arising under this subsection; and

The Commission is authorized to develop, if necessary, rules and regulations, including a definition of good faith negotiations, to implement this section.

History.
2001, c. 76; 2006, cc. 73, 76; 2012, cc. 545, 674.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 73 and 76 are identical, and substituted “Article 1.2 (§

15.2-2108

.19 et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 15.2” for “§

15.2-2108

” in the paragraph defining “Cable television system” in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 545 and 674 are identical, and added the paragraph defining “Electric cooperative” in subsection A, and added subsection F.